Illinois, session 104th, HB5558.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-39001 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-39001)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-39001)7    Sec. 5-39001. Establishment and use; fee. The county board 8of any county may establish and maintain a county law library, 9to be located in any county building or privately or publicly 10owned building at the county seat of government. The term 11"county building" includes premises leased by the county from 12a public building commission created under the Public Building 13Commission Act. After August 2, 1976, the county board of any 14county may establish and maintain a county law library at the 15county seat of government and, in addition, branch law 16libraries in other locations within that county as the county 17board deems necessary. 18    The facilities of those libraries shall be freely 19available to all licensed Illinois attorneys, judges, other 20public officers of the county, and all members of the public, 21whenever the court house is open, and may include self-help 22centers and other legal assistance programs for the public as 23part of the services it provides on-site and online. The   HB5558- 2 -LRB104 18092 TRT 31531 b1libraries shall be open whenever the court house is open, 2unless the libraries are closed based on operational necessity 3or as determined by the county board. 4    The expense of establishing and maintaining those 5libraries shall be borne by the county. To defray that 6expense, including the expense of any attendant self-help 7centers and legal assistance programs, in any county having 8established a county law library or libraries, the clerk of 9all trial courts located at the county seat of government 10shall charge and collect a county law library fee of $2, and 11the county board may authorize a county law library fee of not 12to exceed $21 through December 31, 2021 and $20 on and after 13January 1, 2022, to be charged and collected by the clerks of 14all trial courts located in the county. The fee shall be paid 15at the time of filing the first pleading, paper, or other 16appearance filed by each party in all civil cases, but no 17additional fee shall be required if more than one party is 18represented in a single pleading, paper, or other appearance. 19    Each clerk shall commence those charges and collections 20upon receipt of written notice from the chairman of the county 21board that the board has acted under this Division to 22establish and maintain a law library. 23    The fees shall be in addition to all other fees and charges 24of the clerks, assessable as costs, remitted by the clerks 25monthly to the county treasurer or other appropriate county 26office, and retained by the county treasurer in a special fund   HB5558- 3 -LRB104 18092 TRT 31531 b1designated as the County Law Library Fund. Except as otherwise 2provided in this paragraph, disbursements from the fund shall 3be made by the county treasurer, on order of a majority of the 4resident circuit judges of the circuit court of the county. In 5any county with more than 2,000,000 inhabitants, the county 6board shall order disbursements from the fund and the 7presiding officer of the county board, with the advice and 8consent of the county board, may appoint a library committee 9of not less than 9 members, who, by majority vote, may 10recommend to the county board as to disbursements of the fund 11and the operation of the library. In single county circuits 12with 2,000,000 or fewer inhabitants, disbursements from the 13County Law Library Fund shall be made by the county treasurer 14on the order of the chief judge of the circuit court of the 15county. In those single county circuits, the number of 16personnel necessary to operate and maintain the county law 17library shall be set by and those personnel shall be appointed 18by the chief judge. The county law library personnel shall 19serve at the pleasure of the appointing authority. The 20salaries of those personnel shall be fixed by the county board 21of the county. Orders shall be pre-audited, funds shall be 22audited by the county auditor, and a report of the orders and 23funds shall be rendered to the county board and to the judges. 24    Fees shall not be charged in any criminal or 25quasi-criminal case, in any matter coming to the clerk on 26change of venue, or in any proceeding to review the decision of   HB5558- 4 -LRB104 18092 TRT 31531 b1any administrative officer, agency, or body. 2    No moneys distributed from the County Law Library Fund may 3be directly or indirectly used for lobbying activities, as 4defined in Section 2 of the Lobbyist Registration Act or as 5defined in any ordinance or resolution of a municipality, 6county, or other unit of local government in Illinois. 7(Source: P.A. 98-351, eff. 8-15-13; 99-859, eff. 8-19-16.)